California, session 20252026, AB667.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 41 is added to the Business and Professions Code, to read:41. (a) For purposes of this section:(1) “Board” means any board under the jurisdiction of the Department of Consumer Affairs, as specified in Section 101, with the exception of boards within Division 2 (commencing with Section 500).(2) “Interpreter” means a person who is fluent in English and in the necessary second language and who can accurately speak, read, and readily interpret the necessary second language, or a person who can accurately sign and read sign language.(3) “Substantial number of non-English-speaking applicants” means applicants who either do not speak English or who are unable to effectively communicate in English because it is not their native language, and who comprise 5 percent or more of the total number of applicants.(b) By July 1, 2026, January 1, 2027, each board shall include an additional section in a license application that asks an applicant to identify their preferred written, spoken, and signed languages.(c) Beginning July 1, 2027, each board shall conduct an annual review of applicants’ language preferences that are collected from license applications.(d) (1) By July 1, 2027, each board shall determine whether there is a substantial number of non-English-speaking applicants who require the services of an interpreter. Each board shall report the determinations to the Legislature by January 1, 2028.(2) The report shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.(3) Pursuant to Section 10231.5 of the Government Code, this subdivision shall become inoperative on January 1, 2030. (e) (1) Beginning January 1, 2029, each board shall annually report to the Senate Business, Professions, and Economic Development and the Assembly Business and Professions Committees on language preference data collected from license applications.(2) The report shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.(3) Pursuant to Section 10231.5 of the Government Code, this subdivision shall become inoperative on January 1, 2033.